trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/tomerge-apertium-swe-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="/vel__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>vel</l>       <r>vel<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bedre</l>     <r>vel<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bedst</l>     <r>vel<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ret__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tere</l>      <r><s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>test</l>      <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ofte__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/å__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ærre</l>      <r>å<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ærrest</l>    <r>å<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="me/get__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>get</l>       <r>get<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>get<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r>get<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Prepositions -->

<pardef n="på__pr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Conjunctions -->

<pardef n="og__cnjcoo">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="at__cnjsub">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="alt_imens__cnjadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Determiners -->

<pardef n="e/n__det">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/en__det">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mi/n__det">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="di/n__det">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dens__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="si/n__det">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="vores__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hver__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mang/e__det">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="flere__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="første__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/enne__det">
  <e>       <p><l>enne</l>      <r>enne<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ette</l>      <r>enne<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isse</l>      <r>enne<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nog/en__det">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="in/gen__det">
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r>gen<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tet</l>       <r>gen<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r>gen<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Is this a determiner?! Yes it is, but it has other forms as well
    <pardef n="selv__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    -->

<pardef n="ens__det"> <!-- PT: possesivt pronomen från pers pron 'man'-->
<e c="mina" a="PT">       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Proper nouns -->

<pardef n="S__case"> <!-- Case endings for nouns not ending on s (mand / mands) -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="apos__case"> <!-- Case endings for nouns ending on s (hus / hus' ) -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Danmark__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Schweiz__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Eva__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Trond__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Anders__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Magnusson__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Wikipedia__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Interjections -->

<pardef n="ak__ij">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Abbreviations -->

<pardef n="t.eks.__abbr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Pronouns -->

<pardef n="/jeg__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>jeg</l>       <r>jeg<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mig</l>       <r>jeg<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="deres">           <i>deres</i><par n="vores__det"/></e>
<e lm="din">             <i>di</i><par n="di/n__det"/></e>
<e lm="dens" a="PT">             <i>dens</i><par n="dens__det"/></e>
<e lm="en">              <i>e</i><par n="e/n__det"/></e>
<e lm="ens" a="PT">              <i>ens</i><par n="ens__det"/></e>
<e lm="den">             <i>d</i><par n="d/en__det"/></e>
<e lm="jeres">           <i>jeres</i><par n="vores__det"/></e>
<e lm="mange">           <i>mang</i><par n="mang/e__det"/></e>
<e lm="flere">           <i>flere</i><par n="flere__det"/></e>
<e lm="flest">           <i>flest</i><par n="flere__det"/></e>
<e lm="min">             <i>mi</i><par n="mi/n__det"/></e>
<e lm="sin">             <i>si</i><par n="si/n__det"/></e>
<e lm="vores">           <i>vores</i><par n="vores__det"/></e>
<e lm="hver">            <i>hver</i><par n="hver__det"/></e>
<e lm="denne">           <i>d</i><par n="d/enne__det"/></e>
<e lm="ingen">           <i>in</i><par n="in/gen__det"/></e>
<e lm="nogen">           <i>nog</i><par n="nog/en__det"/></e>
<e lm="selv"><i>selv</i><par n="selv__det"/></e>
<e lm="tredje">          <i>tredje</i><par n="første__det"/></e>
<e lm="femte">           <i>femte</i><par n="første__det"/></e>
<e lm="niende">          <i>niende</i><par n="første__det"/></e>
<e lm="igennem">         <i>igennem</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ovenover">        <i>ovenover</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="undtagen">        <i>undtagen</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="fandens" c="style:vulg" a="PT">              <i>fandens</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
<e lm="hopsa" a="PT">              <i>hopsa</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
<e lm="ugh" a="PT">              <i>ugh</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
<e lm="t.o.m." a="PT">              <i>t.o.m.</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="bla" r="RL" a="PT">              <i>bla</i><par n="t.eks.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="jeg">             <i></i><par n="/jeg__prn"/></e>
<e lm="lige som">        <i>lige<b/>som</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="og">              <i>og</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="uden">            <i>uden</i><par n="og__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="fordi">           <i>fordi</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="om">              <i>om</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="såfremt">              <i>såfremt</i><par n="at__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="enten">           <i>enten</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="inden">           <i>inden</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="som om">          <i>som<b/>om</i><par n="alt_imens__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="få">              <i>f</i><par n="f/å__adv"/></e>
<e lm="meget">           <i>me</i><par n="me/get__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ofte">            <i>ofte</i><par n="ofte__adv"/></e>
<e lm="vel">             <i></i><par n="/vel__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ret">             <i>ret</i><par n="ret__adv"/></e>
<e lm="Thomas">          <i>Thomas</i><par n="Anders__np"/></e>
<e lm="Knutsson">        <i>Knutsson</i><par n="Magnusson__np"/></e>
<e lm="Samuelsson">      <i>Samuelsson</i><par n="Magnusson__np"/></e>
<e lm="Magnusson">       <i>Magnusson</i><par n="Magnusson__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jonas">           <i>Jonas</i><par n="Anders__np"/></e>
<e lm="Carl">            <i>Carl</i><par n="Trond__np"/></e>
<e lm="Harry">           <i>Harry</i><par n="Trond__np"/></e>
<e lm="James">           <i>James</i><par n="Anders__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mikael">          <i>Mikael</i><par n="Trond__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eva">             <i>Eva</i><par n="Eva__np"/></e>
<e lm="Maria">           <i>Maria</i><par n="Eva__np"/></e>
<e lm="Madeleine">       <i>Madeleine</i><par n="Eva__np"/></e>
<e lm="Schweiz">         <i>Schweiz</i><par n="Schweiz__np"/></e>
<e lm="Skåne">           <i>Skåne</i><par n="Danmark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Barbados">        <i>Barbados</i><par n="Schweiz__np"/></e>
<e lm="Litauen">         <i>Litauen</i><par n="Danmark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mauritius">       <i>Mauritius</i><par n="Schweiz__np"/></e>
<e lm="York">            <i>York</i><par n="Danmark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Wikimedia">       <i>Wikimedia</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Wikipedia">       <i>Wikipedia</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Wiktionary">      <i>Wiktionary</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
